Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.060

Rural library districts—General powers.

A rural county library district shall be a public corporation with such powers as are necessary to carry out its functions and for taxation purposes shall have the power vested in municipal corporations for such purposes.

[ 1984 c 186 s 6; 1983 c 167 s 19; 1980 c 100 s 1; 1955 c 59 s 6. Prior: 1947 c 75 s 11, part; 1943 c 251 s 1, part; 1941 c 65 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8226-4a, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.